District of Columbia statutes.
8-651.01

Findings.

(a)

The urban forest of the District of Columbia, growing on both public and private land, is one of the District’s great natural resources.

(b)

A healthy, vibrant urban forest provides numerous environmental benefits, including:

(1)

Heat island effect mitigation and reduced energy use;

(2)

Better air quality and reduced water pollution; and

(3)

Quieter and more beautiful neighborhoods.

(c)

The trees comprising the urban forest have significant aesthetic value, which enhances property values and the quality of life in neighborhoods throughout the District.

June 12, 2003, D.C. Law 14-309, § 101, 50 DCR 888

History

Delegation of Authority to the Urban Forest Preservation Act of 2002 and the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs Civil Infractions Act of 1985, see Mayor’s Order 2003-173, December 1, 2003 ( 50 DCR 10619).

Delegation of Authority